Illinois, session 104th, SB3285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Passenger Rail Planning Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Illinois is the historic and operational hub of 8    the nation's passenger rail network, serving as the 9    national terminal for multiple passenger rail routes 10    providing vital interstate and regional connections.11        (2) The Federal Railroad Administration's Midwest 12    Regional Rail Plan (2021) identifies Illinois as the 13    center of a high-frequency intercity rail system 14    connecting major Midwestern cities and states. The Plan 15    identifies service levels on 4 routes radiating from 16    Chicago with 16 hourly to 25 hourly, plus half-hourly 17    peaks, daily departures in each direction per day.18        (3) The Midwest Regional Rail Plan also identifies 19    other routes radiating from Chicago without specifying 20    service levels.21        (4) Increasing passenger rail service frequencies 22    across all corridors and long-distance routes will 23    strengthen Illinois' economy, reduce congestion, improve   SB3285- 2 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1    sustainability, and enhance access to federal and private 2    investment.3        (5) It is, therefore, the policy of the State to 4    define and pursue an integrated high-speed and intercity 5    passenger rail network as part of the Illinois State Rail 6    Plan and to ensure that these criteria are incorporated 7    into all metropolitan, regional, and statewide 8    transportation planning processes in a manner consistent 9    with federal law and planning cycles.10        (6) The General Assembly recognizes that many existing 11    intercity and long-distance passenger rail services within 12    the State operate over infrastructure that is privately 13    owned and controlled by railroads. These railroads operate 14    complex, capital-intensive networks with operating 15    practices designed to meet the needs of their customers, 16    including the efficient movement of long trains whose 17    schedules may be less time-sensitive than frequent 18    passenger rail service. High-frequency, time-sensitive 19    passenger rail operations may be operationally 20    inconsistent with certain railroad business models, 21    particularly where network capacity is constrained or 22    dispatching priorities differ.23        (7) The General Assembly further recognizes that train 24    paths, operating slots, dispatching priority, and network 25    capacity on privately owned railroad infrastructure are 26    valuable commercial assets. Sustainable and scalable   SB3285- 3 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1    passenger rail service requires fair, transparent, and 2    mutually beneficial compensation arrangements that reflect 3    the value of these assets, the opportunity costs of their 4    use, and the capital and operating impacts borne by 5    railroads.6        (8) The aspirational passenger rail frequencies 7    established in this Act are intended to guide long-term 8    planning and investment prioritization and shall not be 9    construed to require that future passenger rail services 10    operate on the same rail lines, alignments, or 11    infrastructure currently in use. In planning to achieve 12    these frequencies, the Department of Transportation and 13    Metropolitan Planning Organizations shall consider all 14    reasonable infrastructure and operational options, 15    including capacity expansions, grade separations, advanced 16    dispatching systems, shared-use agreements, and the 17    construction of new or improved publicly owned rail 18    infrastructure where appropriate.19        (9) The General Assembly affirms the essential role of 20    railroads in supporting the State's economy, supply 21    chains, and industrial competitiveness. Railroads 22    operating within the State have distinct network 23    configurations, customer mixes, investment strategies, and 24    long-term growth plans. Passenger rail planning under this 25    Act shall consider these differences and seek solutions 26    that respect railroad operational needs while advancing   SB3285- 4 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1    statewide passenger mobility goals.2        (10) The General Assembly further finds that intercity 3    passenger rail planning is closely linked to airport 4    planning and aviation system performance. Planning under 5    this Act shall consider how expanded passenger rail 6    service can improve access to commercial service airports, 7    reduce roadway congestion, and expand nonautomobile travel 8    options for passengers, employees, and visitors traveling 9    to and from airports.10        (11) Passenger rail planning shall also consider 11    airside capacity constraints at airports, including gate 12    utilization, runway capacity, and airline slot usage, and 13    how improved rail connectivity may allow certain 14    short-haul air markets to be supplemented or replaced by 15    passenger rail service where appropriate. Such planning 16    may identify opportunities to reallocate limited aviation 17    capacity toward longer-distance or higher-value air 18    service when comparable rail alternatives exist. 19    Section 10. Establishment of target rail frequencies.20    (a) The following criteria are established for intercity 21passenger rail routes serving or originating in the State. 22This outline shall serve as official benchmarks for statewide 23rail planning, investment prioritization, and coordination 24with neighboring states, Amtrak, and other railroads.25    (b) The following corridors shall be designated as:  SB3285- 5 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1        (1) Hourly service routes, with trains operating on 2    pulse schedules at least once per hour, in each direction, 3    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):4            (A) Chicago to Milwaukee.5            (B) Chicago to Madison to St. Paul.6            (C) Chicago to Rockford.7            (D) Chicago to East St. Louis to St. Louis to 8        Kansas City.9            (E) Chicago to Detroit to Toronto.10            (F) Chicago to Cleveland.11            (G) Chicago to Fort Wayne to Columbus.12            (H) Chicago to Indianapolis to Cincinnati.13            (I) Chicago to Indianapolis to Louisville to 14        Nashville to Atlanta.15            (J) Chicago to Champaign.16            (K) Chicago to the Northeast Corridor (Acela).17        (2) Every-2-hour service routes, with trains operating 18    at least once per every 2 hours, in each direction, 19    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):20            (A) Chicago to Moline.21            (B) Chicago to Peoria.22            (C) Milwaukee to Green Bay (by extension of 23        Chicago to Milwaukee).24        (3) Every-4-hour service routes, with trains operating 25    at least once per every 4 hours, in each direction, 26    throughout the day (5 a.m. to 10 p.m.):  SB3285- 6 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1            (A) Champaign to Carbondale to Memphis (by 2        extension of Chicago to Champaign).3            (B) Rockford to East Dubuque (by extension of 4        Chicago to Rockford).5            (C) Quad Cities to Des Moines to Omaha to Denver 6        (by extension of Chicago to Moline).7            (D) Chicago to Galesburg to Quincy to Hannibal.8    (c) The Department of Transportation shall incorporate 9these aspirational service frequencies into the Illinois State 10Rail Plan prepared under 49 U.S.C. 22705 and into the 11Long-Range Statewide Transportation Plan required under 23 12U.S.C. 135.13    (d) For each interstate corridor identified in subsection 14(b), the Department of Transportation is authorized and 15encouraged to:16        (1) nominate such corridors for inclusion in the 17    Federal Railroad Administration's Corridor Identification 18    and Development Program under 49 U.S.C. 25101; and19        (2) enter into memoranda of understanding or other 20    cooperative agreements with neighboring states under 23 21    U.S.C. 135(b)(1) and 135(c), and consistent with 23 U.S.C. 22    135(e)(3), to provide for shared data, joint investment 23    prioritization, and aligned performance measures and 24    planning schedules.25    (e) The Department of Transportation shall evaluate 26opportunities to designate and advance one or more of the   SB3285- 7 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1corridors identified in subsection (b) as components of the 2National Multimodal Freight Network under 49 U.S.C. 70103, 3consistent with the national multimodal freight policy under 449 U.S.C. 70101, where such designations would enhance 5eligibility for federal discretionary or formula funding.6    (f) The Department of Transportation shall include a 7recurring section titled "Progress Toward High-Speed and 8Intercity Passenger Rail" within each update of the Illinois 9State Rail Plan and Statewide Transportation Improvement 10Program. That section shall summarize:11        (1) the current level of service frequency in each 12    corridor;13        (2) the gap between existing and aspirational service 14    levels;15        (3) investments, capital improvements, or service 16    agreements made toward achieving the target frequencies; 17    and18        (4) coordination with neighboring states, Amtrak, and 19    federal agencies to advance these targets.20    (g) The Department of Transportation shall transmit each 21updated Progress Toward High-Speed and Intercity Passenger 22Rail section to the Governor and the General Assembly 23concurrently with the Illinois State Rail Plan submission to 24the Federal Railroad Administration.25    (h) The Department of Transportation shall align 26submissions and project proposals with applicable federal   SB3285- 8 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1selection preferences in intercity passenger rail and 2multimodal grant programs, including 49 U.S.C. 24911 3(Federal-State Partnership for Intercity Passenger Rail), 4where consistency with the Corridor Identification and 5Development Program (49 U.S.C. 25101) is favored.6    (i) In carrying out the requirements of this Act, the 7Department of Transportation shall coordinate passenger rail 8planning with airport sponsors, aviation authorities, and 9relevant planning agencies. Such coordination shall address 10both landside access to airports, including passenger rail 11connections, and airside capacity considerations, including 12potential implications for gate usage, airline scheduling, and 13regional aviation demand where passenger rail alternatives are 14planned or proposed.15    (j) To the extent a State rail plan or related statewide 16rail planning document is in effect or subsequently adopted, 17the Department of Transportation shall ensure reciprocal 18integration between passenger rail planning under this Act and 19other statewide rail planning efforts. Such integration shall 20include consideration of railroad capacity needs and expansion 21plans in passenger rail planning, and consideration of 22aspirational passenger rail service levels when evaluating 23infrastructure investments, including new or replacement 24bridges, grade separations, terminal improvements, and 25dispatching protocols intended to reduce operational 26conflicts.   SB3285- 9 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1    Section 15. Metropolitan Planning Organization 2coordination.3    (a) Each Metropolitan Planning Organization established 4under 23 U.S.C. 134 within this State shall, during each 5federally required update of its metropolitan long-range 6transportation plan or Transportation Improvement Program:7        (1) recognize the target intercity and long-distance 8    passenger rail frequencies established in Section 10;9        (2) identify relevant rail corridors within or 10    adjacent to the Metropolitan Planning Organization 11    planning area; and12        (3) include a narrative discussion of how regional 13    transportation investments can support achievement of 14    those frequency targets.15    (b) The Department of Transportation shall provide 16technical assistance, data, modeling tools, and mapping 17resources to Metropolitan Planning Organizations and regional 18councils to facilitate integration of passenger rail 19frequencies into multimodal planning. The Department of 20Transportation may enter into memoranda of understanding with 21Amtrak, neighboring state departments of transportation, or 22regional rail authorities to share data and coordinate 23planning consistent with this Act.24    (c) The Department of Transportation shall, at least once 25every 4 years and consistent with the federal planning update   SB3285- 10 -LRB104 17224 LNS 30645 b1cycle, convene consultations with each Metropolitan Planning 2Organization to review passenger rail investments, identify 3opportunities to advance frequency targets, and coordinate 4applications for federal or multistate funding that support 5those goals. 6    Section 20. Investment prioritization. The Department of 7Transportation and each Metropolitan Planning Organization 8shall, to the maximum extent practicable, consider progress 9toward the target passenger rail frequencies established in 10Section 10 when developing project prioritization criteria for 11multimodal investments, particularly those affecting rail 12capacity, terminal access, or multimodal connectivity. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.